Florida, session 2026, SB96.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âSection 295.158, Florida Statutes, is created to 21 read: 22 295.158âVeterans Dental Care Program.â 23 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 24 (a)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Veteransâ Affairs. 25 (b)ââEligible veteranâ means a resident of this state who 26 has been honorably discharged from the United States Armed 27 Forces. 28 (c)ââProgramâ means the Veterans Dental Care Program. 29 (2)âThere is created within the department the Veterans 30 Dental Care Program to expand access to comprehensive services 31 for eligible veterans. 32 (3)âThe program must provide, at a minimum, the following 33 dental services: 34 (a)âPreventative care, including, but not limited to, 35 routine dental examinations and prophylaxis cleanings. 36 (b)âBasic restorative care including, but not limited to, 37 dental fillings. 38 (c)âAdvanced restorative care, including, but not limited 39 to, dental crowns and tooth extractions. 40 (d)âEndodontic care, including, but not limited to, root 41 canal therapy. 42 (e)âProsthodontic care, including, but not limited to, 43 dental bridges, partial dentures, complete dentures, and dental 44 implants. 45 (4)âThe department may provide services through any of the 46 following: 47 (a)âContracts with licensed community health centers, 48 nonprofit dental clinics, and private providers. 49 (b)âPartnerships with accredited dental schools in this 50 state to increase access and reduce costs. 51 (c)âMobile dental units serving rural and underserved areas 52 of this state. 53 (5)(a)âFunding for the program is subject to appropriation 54 by the Legislature. 55 (b)âThe department may seek federal matching funds, private 56 donations, or grants to supplement program funding. 57 (6)âBeginning January 1, 2027, and every January 1 58 thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the 59 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 60 House of Representatives. The report must include all of the 61 following: 62 (a)âThe number of veterans served under the program. 63 (b)âThe types of services provided. 64 (c)âThe programâs expenditures and sources of funding. 65 (d)âRecommendations, if any, to improve the program. 66 (7)âThe department shall adopt rules to implement this 67 section. 68 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.